Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.290

Secretary to adopt rules—2015 1st sp.s. c 7.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

The secretary shall adopt rules as may be necessary to implement chapter 7, Laws of 2015 1st sp. sess.

[ 2015 1st sp.s. c 7 s 11.]

NOTES:

Finding—2015 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 10.77.075.

Effective dates—2015 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 10.77.075.